Wyoming statutes. Title 7 Criminal Procedure
Article 5. Prevention of Crime

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Utilizing the Tools: Successfully Implementing the Stalking Statutes,” see XXXV Land & Water L. Rev. 521 (2000).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

8 Am. Jur. 2d Bail and Recognizance § 1 et seq.; 12 Am. Jur. 2d Breach of Peace and Disorderly Conduct §§ 39 to 44.

24 C.J.S. Criminal Law §§ 1724 to 1737.

§ 7-3-501.
Filing of complaint; issuance of warrant or summons.

As used in W.S.

7-3-501

through

7-3-505

“judge” means a circuit court judge.

When complaint is made by the district attorney or by any private person to any circuit court judge that a person has threatened or is about to commit a breach of the peace or an offense against the person or property of another, the judge shall:

Examine under oath the complainant and any witnesses who may be produced;

Reduce the complaint and a concise statement of the testimony of the witnesses to writing; and

Cause the complaint to be subscribed and sworn to.

If it appears there is probable cause to believe the offense will be committed, the judge shall issue a warrant for the arrest of the person complained against or issue a summons for him to appear and answer the complaint.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 14, § 1; R.S. 1887, § 3156; R.S. 1899, § 5430; C.S. 1910, § 6301; C.S. 1920, § 7597; R.S. 1931, § 33-1401; C.S. 1945, § 10-101; W.S. 1957, § 7-58; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3; 2000, ch. 24, § 4; 2004, ch. 42, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to issuance of warrants by circuit courts and magistrates, see §§

5-9-133

and

5-9-208

, respectively.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a), deleted “or a justice of the peace” at the end; and in (b) deleted “justice of the peace or” following “any private person to any.”

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

§ 7-3-502.
Examination of party complained against; recognizance to keep peace.

When the party complained against appears before the judge the testimony produced on both sides shall be heard if the allegations of the complaint are controverted. If, upon examination, it appears to the judge that there is no probable cause to believe that the offense will be committed, the person complained against shall be discharged. If, however, the judge finds that there is probable cause to believe that the offense will be committed, he shall order the person complained against to give a recognizance, with good and sufficient surety in the form of cash, bond or other property, in any sum the judge directs. The recognizance shall be conditioned that the person complained against shall keep the peace toward all people of this state, and especially towards the person against whom or whose property there is reason to believe the offense will be committed, for a period of time determined by the judge not exceeding twelve (12) months.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 14, § 2; R.S. 1887, § 3157; R.S. 1899, § 5431; C.S. 1910, § 6302; C.S. 1920, § 7598; R.S. 1931, § 33-1402; C.S. 1945, § 10-102; W.S. 1957, § 7-59; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3.

§ 7-3-503.
Compliance with recognizance order; failure to give recognizance.

If a person ordered to give recognizance complies with the order he shall be discharged and the recognizance returned to him.

If a person ordered to give recognizance and surety refuses or neglects to do so, the judge may order the person to show cause why he should not be committed to jail. If the judge finds that the person’s default is willful or is due to his failure to make a good faith effort to obtain the surety required, the judge may order him committed to jail until the surety, or a specified part thereof is given, provided that such commitment shall not exceed six (6) months.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 14, § 3; R.S. 1887, § 3158; R.S. 1899, § 5432; C.S. 1910, § 6303; C.S. 1920, § 7599; R.S. 1931, § 33-1403; C.S. 1945, § 10-103; W.S. 1957, § 7-60; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3.

§ 7-3-504.
Judgment against complainant; defects in complaint.

If the person complained against is discharged after hearing because no probable cause is found and if the judge finds that the complaint was commenced maliciously and without reasonable cause on the part of the complainant, the judge may enter judgment against the complainant for the costs of the proceedings and the reasonable attorney’s fees of the person complained against. If the person complained against is required to give recognizance the judge may assess the costs of the proceedings against him.

A proceeding to prevent an offense under this article shall not be dismissed because of any informality or insufficiency of the complaint or other document in the proceeding. The complaint may be amended by the judge to conform to the evidence in the case.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 14, § 4; R.S. 1887, § 3159; R.S. 1899, § 5433; C.S. 1910, § 6304; C.S. 1920, § 7600; R.S. 1931, § 33-1404; C.S. 1945, § 10-104; W.S. 1957, § 7-61; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3; 2010, ch. 69, § 301; ch 82, § 1.

The 2010 amendment,

in (b), substituted “under this article” for “under this section.”

Laws 2010, ch. 82, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 9, 2010.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2010, ch. 82, § 5, provides: “Except as provided in section 4 of this act, any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Cited

in

Dave v. Valdez, 2012 WY 59, 275 P.3d 485,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 62

(Apr. 13, 2012).

§ 7-3-505.
Filing of recognizance; forfeiture.

A recognizance taken in accordance with W.S.

7-3-501

through

7-3-505

shall be filed by the clerk of the court in the court records. Upon a breach of the condition of the recognizance, the court shall declare a forfeiture of the security in the manner provided for the forfeiture of bail in criminal cases, except for good cause shown.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 14, § 6; R.S. 1887, § 3161; R.S. 1899, § 5435; C.S. 1910, § 6306; C.S. 1920, § 7602; R.S. 1931, § 33-1406; C.S. 1945, § 10-106; W.S. 1957, § 7-63; W.S. 1977, §

7-3-506

; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to forfeiture of bail, see Rule 3.1(d), W.R. Cr. P.

§ 7-3-506.
Definitions.

As used in W.S.

7-3-506

through

7-3-512

:

“Court” means the circuit court in the county where an alleged victim of stalking or sexual assault resides, or where the alleged perpetrator of the stalking or sexual assault is found;

“Order of protection” means a court order granted for the protection of a victim of stalking or a victim of sexual assault;

“Sexual assault” means any act made criminal pursuant to W.S.

6-2-302

and

6-2-303

and

6-2-314

through

6-2-318

or an attempt or conspiracy to commit such act;

“Stalking” means conduct as defined by W.S. 6-2-506(b).

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 92, § 1; 2000, ch. 24, § 4; 2004, ch. 42, § 1; 2015 ch. 144, § 2, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a)(i), deleted “justice of the peace court” following “means the.”

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in the introductory language of (a), substituted “through

7-3-512

” for “through

7-3-511

”; in (a)(i), deleted “or the district court” following “circuit court,” and inserted “or sexual assault” twice; in (a)(ii), inserted “or a victim of sexual assault”; inserted present (a)(iii); and redesignated former (a)(iii) as (a)(iv).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Statutes constitutional. —

The validity of this section through §

7-3-511

depends upon the constitutionality of the criminal stalking statute adopted by reference in subsection (a)(iii) and the criminal stalking statute has been held to be constitutional; therefore these statutes are constitutional. Luplow v. State, 897 P.2d 463,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 101

(Wyo. 1995).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Wyoming Criminal Code Revisited: Reflections after Fifteen Years,” see XXXIII Land and Water L. Rev. 523 (1998).

§ 7-3-507.
Petition for order of protection; contents; requisites; indigent petitioners.

A petition for an order of protection for a victim may be filed by:

The victim;

If the victim consents, the district attorney on behalf of the victim; or

Any person with legal authority to act on behalf of the victim if the victim is:

A minor;

A vulnerable adult as defined in W.S. 35-20-102(a)(xviii);

Any other adult who, because of age, disability, health or inaccessibility, cannot file the petition.

The petition shall be accompanied or supplemented by one (1) or more sworn affidavits setting out specific facts showing the alleged stalking or sexual assault and the identity of the alleged perpetrator.

No filing fee shall be charged for the filing of a petition under this section nor shall a fee be charged for service of process.

The attorney general shall promulgate a standard petition form which may be used by petitioners. The clerk of the circuit or district court shall make standard petition forms available to petitioners, with instructions for completion, without charge. If the petition is not filed by the district attorney, the court may appoint an attorney to represent an indigent petitioner. Nothing in this subsection shall prevent the victim from hiring an attorney or filing a petition pro se.

A petition may be filed under this section whether or not the individual who is alleged to have engaged in a course of conduct prohibited under W.S.

6-2-506

or engaged in the conduct specified in W.S. 7-3-506(a)(iii) has been charged or convicted for the alleged crime.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 92, § 1; 2004, ch. 42, § 1; 2015 ch. 144, § 2, effective July 1, 2015; 2018 ch. 97, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

The 2004 amendment,

in (d), substituted “The clerk of the circuit” for “The justice of the peace or the clerk of the county.”

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, rewrote (a), which formerly read: “A victim of stalking, or the district attorney on behalf of the alleged victim, may file with the court a petition for an order of protection”; in (b), inserted “or sexual assault,” and substituted “perpetrator” for “stalker”; in (c), inserted “or engaged in the conduct specified in W.S. 7-3-506(a)(iii),” and substituted “convicted” for “convicted under W.S.

6-2-506

.”

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in the introductory language of (a), deleted the former first sentence, which read: “A petition for an order of protection may be filed by a victim of stalking, or the district attorney on behalf of the alleged victim,” and deleted “sexual assault” preceding “may be filed by.”

Editor’s notes. —

Laws 2018,
ch. 97, § 3, provides: “This act shall apply to crimes committed
and orders of protection issued on or after the effective date of
this act.”

§ 7-3-508.
Temporary order of protection; setting hearing.

Upon the filing of a petition for an order of protection, the court shall schedule a hearing on the petition to be conducted within seventy-two (72) hours after the filing of the petition, and shall cause each party to be served, either within or outside of this state, with an order to appear, a copy of the petition and a copy of the supporting affidavits. Service shall be made upon each party at least twenty-four (24) hours before the hearing. The failure to hold or complete the hearing within seventy-two (72) hours shall not affect the validity of the hearing or any order issued thereon.

If the court determines from the specific facts shown by the petition and supporting affidavits that there exists a clear and present danger of further stalking, sexual assault or of serious physical adverse consequences to any person, the court may grant ex parte a temporary order of protection pending the hearing, and shall cause a copy of the temporary order of protection to be served on each party, either within or outside of this state. The court may prescribe terms in the temporary order of protection which it deems sufficient to protect the victim and any other person pending the hearing, including but not limited to the elements described in W.S. 7-3-509(a).

A temporary order of protection issued under paragraph (b) of this section shall contain a notice that willful violation of any provision of the order constitutes a crime as defined by W.S. 7-3-510(c) and can result in immediate arrest. The order shall also state that a violation that constitutes the offense of stalking as defined by W.S. 6-2-506(b) may subject the perpetrator to enhanced penalties for felony stalking under W.S. 6-2-506(e).

An ex parte temporary order of protection issued under this section shall not be admissible as evidence in any subsequent criminal proceeding or civil action for damages arising from the conduct alleged in the petition or the order.

No testimony or evidence of the alleged actor in a hearing pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall be admissible, including for impeachment purposes, or be deemed a waiver of any protection against self-incrimination under the constitution of the United States or of the state of Wyoming unless, prior to the hearing, an information or indictment has been filed in a district court charging the alleged actor of a violation of sexual assault as defined by W.S. 7-3-506(a)(iii).

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 92, § 1; 2011, ch. 108, § 1; 2015 ch. 144, § 2, effective July 1, 2015; 2018 ch. 97, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (a) and (b), added “either within or outside of this state.”

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in (b), substituted “sexual assault or of serious physical adverse consequences” for “or of serious adverse consequences” in the first sentence; in (c), divided the existing sentence
into two sentences, and added “Orders involving stalking shall also state that a violation” at the beginning of the second sentence; added (d) and (e); and made related changes.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in the second sentence of (c), substituted “The order shall” for “Orders involving stalking shall” and “that constitutes the offense of stalking as defined by W.S. 6-2-506(b) may” for “may in some cases” following “a violation.”

Editor’s notes. —

Laws 2018,
ch. 97, § 3, provides: “This act shall apply to crimes committed
and orders of protection issued on or after the effective date of
this act.”

Applied in

Dean v. State, 2014 WY 158,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 180

(Dec.
9, 2014).

§ 7-3-509.
Order of protection; contents; remedies; order not to affect title to property.

Following a hearing under W.S. 7-3-508(a) and upon a finding that conduct constituting stalking or sexual assault has been committed, the court shall enter an order of protection ordering the respondent to refrain from any further acts of stalking or sexual assault involving the victim or any other person. As a part of any order of protection, the court may direct that the respondent:

Stay away from the home, school, business or place of employment of the victim or any other locations the court may describe in the order; and

Refrain from contacting, intimidating, threatening or otherwise interfering with the victim of the alleged offense and any other persons, including but not limited to members of the family or household of the victim, as the court may describe in the order. Prohibited contact under this paragraph includes telephone calls, mail, e-mail, texting, fax, contacting through social media using the internet or similar technology and any other form of communication.

The order shall contain a notice that willful violation of any provision of the order constitutes a crime as defined by W.S. 7-3-510(c) and can result in immediate arrest. The order shall also state that a violation that constitutes the offense of stalking as defined by W.S. 6-2-506(b) may subject the perpetrator to enhanced penalties for felony stalking under W.S. 6-2-506(e).

A request by the victim for the perpetrator to violate an order of protection issued under this section or a temporary order of protection issued under W.S.

7-3-508

shall constitute an affirmative defense to a charge of violation of the order by the perpetrator.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 92, § 1; 2015 ch. 144, § 2, effective July 1, 2015; 2018 ch. 97, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in the introductory language of (a), inserted “or sexual assault” twice; in (a)(ii), added the last sentence; in (b), divided the existing sentence
into two sentences, and added “Orders involving stalking shall also state that a violation” at the beginning of the second sentence; added (c); and made related changes.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in the second sentence (b), substituted “The order shall” for “Orders involving stalking shall” and "“that constitutes the offense of stalking as defined by W.S. 6-2-506(b) may” for “may in some cases” following “a violation.”

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2018,
ch. 97, § 3, provides: “This act shall apply to crimes committed
and orders of protection issued on or after the effective date of
this act.”

Applied in

Dean v. State, 2014 WY 158,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 180

(Dec.
9, 2014).

§ 7-3-510.
Service of order; duration and extension of order; violation; remedies not exclusive.

An order of protection granted under W.S.

7-3-509

shall be served upon the respondent pursuant to the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure. A copy of the order of protection shall be filed with the sheriff of the county.

Except as otherwise provided by this subsection, an order of protection granted by the court under W.S.

7-3-509

shall be effective for a fixed period of time not to exceed three (3) years. Either party may move to modify, terminate or extend the order. The order may be extended repetitively upon a showing of good cause for additional periods of time, not to exceed three (3) years each, if the court finds from specific facts that a clear and present danger to the victim continues to exist. If a party subject to an order of protection is sentenced and incarcerated or becomes imprisoned, the running of the time remaining for the order of protection shall be tolled during the term of incarceration or imprisonment. The conditions and provisions of an order of protection shall remain in effect during any period of tolling under this subsection. Upon release from incarceration or imprisonment the effective period of the order of protection shall be the amount of time remaining as of the first day of the term of incarceration or imprisonment or one (1) year from the date of release, whichever is greater.

Willful violation of a temporary order of protection issued under W.S.

7-3-508

or of an order of protection issued under W.S.

7-3-509

is a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both. A temporary order of protection issued under W.S.

7-3-508

and an order of protection issued under W.S.

7-3-509

shall have statewide applicability and a criminal prosecution under this subsection may be commenced in any county in which the respondent commits an act in violation of the order.

The remedies provided by W.S.

7-3-506

through

7-3-512

are in addition to any other civil or criminal remedy available under the law.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 92, § 1; 2006, ch. 78, § 1; 2015 ch. 144, § 2, effective July 1, 2015; 2018 ch. 97, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2018; 2019 ch. 151, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, in (b), substituted “one (1) year” for “three (3) months,” in two places, and inserted the second sentence.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, rewrote (b), which formerly read: “An order of protection granted by the court under W.S.

7-3-509

shall be effective for a fixed period of time not to exceed one (1) year. Either party may move to modify, terminate or extend the order. The order may be extended repetitively upon a showing of good cause for additional periods of time not to exceed one (1) year each”; and in (c), substituted “through

7-3-512

” for “through

7-3-511

.”

The 2018 amendments. —

The first 2018 amendment, by ch. 97, § 1, effective July 1, 2018, in the introductory language of (b), substituted “not to exceed three (3) years” for “as provided in paragraphs (i) and (ii) of this subsection” at the end of the first sentence, and deleted the language at the end, which read: “The period of time for an original order of protection shall be as follows.”

The second 2018 amendment, by ch. 97, § 2, effective July 1, 2018, repealed former (b)(i) which read: "For conduct constituting stalking, the order of protection shall not exceed one (1) year"; and repealed former (b)(ii) which read: "For conduct constituting sexual assault the order of protection shall not exceed the longer of: (A) Six (6) months; or (B) The point in time the respondent is charged with sexual assault or a related criminal offense and the court ordered bond conditions for pre-trial release are at least as restrictive as the original order of protection."

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (b), substituted "Except as otherwise provided by this subsection, an order" for "An order," and "three (3) years" for "one (1) year," and added the fourth, fifth, and sixth sentences.

Editor’s notes. —

Laws 2018,
ch. 97, § 3, provides: “This act shall apply to crimes committed
and orders of protection issued on or after the effective date of
this act.”

Applicability

Laws 2019, ch. 151 § 2, provides: "This act applies to orders of protection granted, modified or extended on or after July 1, 2019."

§ 7-3-511.
Emergency assistance by law enforcement officers; limited liability.

A person who allegedly has been a victim of stalking or sexual assault may request the assistance of a law enforcement agency, which shall respond to the request in a manner appropriate to the circumstances.

A law enforcement officer or agency responding to the request for assistance may take whatever steps are reasonably necessary to protect the victim, including:

Advising the victim of the remedies available under W.S.

7-3-506

through

7-3-512

and the availability of shelter, medical care, counseling, safety planning, victim’s rights counseling and other services;

Advising the victim, when appropriate, of the procedure for initiating proceedings under W.S.

7-3-506

through

7-3-512

or criminal proceedings and the importance of preserving evidence; and

Providing or arranging for transportation of the victim to a medical facility or place of shelter.

Any law enforcement agency or officer responding to a request for assistance under W.S.

7-3-506

through

7-3-512

is immune from civil liability when complying with the request, provided that the agency or officer acts in good faith and in a reasonable manner.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 92, § 1; 2015 ch. 144, § 2, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, substituted “through

7-3-512

” for “through

7-3-511

” in (b)(i), (b)(ii), and (c); in (a), inserted “or sexual assault”; and in (b)(i), inserted “safety planning, victim's rights counseling,” and made a related change.

§ 7-3-512.
Confidentiality in court proceedings.

The court shall enter an order providing for the confidentiality of the name, address, city and state of residence or any other information identifying residence of all parties involved in the sexual assault for all orders issued under W.S.

7-3-508

and

7-3-509

.

History.

2015 ch. 144, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

Effective date. —

Laws 2015, ch. 144, § 1 makes the act effective July 1, 2015.